apertium-jdt.jdt.lexc
! Morphological Transducer for jdt

Multichar_Symbols

! Part of speech categories
%<n%>     ! Noun
%<v%> ! Verb
%<num%>   ! Number
%<adj%>   ! Adjective
%<adv%>   ! Adverb
%<prn%>   ! Pronoun
%<inf%>   ! Infinitive
%<post%>  ! Preposition
%<pr%>   ! preposition
%<conj%>   ! conjunction

! Number morphology
%<pl%>    ! Plural
%<sg%>    ! Singular
%<np%>
! tense
%<az%> ! 
%<pres%>  ! Present
%<attr%>  ! Attributive
%<p1%>    ! First person
%<p2%>    ! Second person
%<p3%>    ! Third person
%<past%>  ! Past
%<pers%>  ! Person
%<dem%>   ! Demonstrative
%<nom%>   ! Nominative
%<gen%>	  ! genitive
%<ez%>
%<det%>   ! determiner

! Other symbols
%>        ! Morpheme boundary
%<dem%>   ! Demonstrative
%<nn%>    ! Inanimate
%<caus%>  ! Causative
%<neg%>   ! Negative
%<abst%>  ! Abstract
% 		  ! a space 

%<aor%>   ! Aorist
%<class%> ! Classifier
%<art%>   ! Article
%<dat%>   ! Dative
%<loc%>   ! Locative
%<prs%>   ! Present subjunctive
%<ins%>   ! Instrumentals

! punctuation 
%<sent%>  ! Sentence marker
%<guio%>  ! Hyphen
%<cm%>    ! Comma
%<apos%>  ! Apostrophe
%<rquot%> ! Quote marker (right hand side) 
%<lquot%> ! Quote marker (left hand side) 
%<rpar%>  ! Parenthetical marker (right hand side) 
%<lpar%>  ! Parenthetical marker (left hand side) 

%[%-neg%] !negative verb
%[%+neg%]
%[%-nen%] !negative noun
%[%+nen%]
%[%-loc%] !locative noun
%[%+loc%]


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!                       M O R P H O T A C T I C S                         !!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON Root

PrefixRoot ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
LEXICON PrefixRoot 

%[%-neg%]:не VerbRoot ;
%[%-nen%]:би NounRoot ;
%[%-loc%]:е NounRoot ;
VerbRoot ;
NounRoot ;
PronounRoot ;
NumberRoot ;
PrepositionRoot ;
AdverbRoot ;
AdjectiveRoot ;
ArticleRoot ;
AblativeRoot ;
Punctuation ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
LEXICON RegNumber 

%<num%>: # ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
LEXICON RegArticle 

%<art%>%<p1%>: # ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
LEXICON RegAdjective 
%<adj%>: # ;
%<n%>%<az%>:и # ;
%<n%>%<attr%>+%<adj%>: # ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
LEXICON Punctuation

.%<sent%>:. # ;
..%<sent%>:.. # ;
...%<sent%>:... # ;
%;%<sent%>:%; # ;
%:%<sent%>:%: # ;
%!%<sent%>:%! # ;
%-%<guio%>:%- # ;
%—%<guio%>:%— # ;
,%<cm%>:, # ;
%?%<sent%>:%? # ;
%'%<apos%>:%' # ;
%"%<sent%>:%" # ;
%«%<lquot%>:%« # ;
%»%<rquot%>:%» # ;
%”%<rquot%>:%” # ;
%“%<lquot%>:%“ # ;
%(%<lpar%>:%( # ;
%]%<rpar%>:%] # ;
%[%<lpar%>:%[ # ;
%)%<rpar%>:%) # ;
\%<sent%>:\ # ;
/%<sent%>:/ # ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
LEXICON RegVerbCon

%<v%>%<inf%>:де #  ; 

%<v%>: # ;
%<v%>%<past%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:дум #  ; 
%<v%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:д #  ; 
%<v%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<pl%>:гьо #  ; 

%<v%>%<sg%>%<p1%>: #  ; 
%<v%>%<caus%>%<inf%>:унде #  ; ! caustative

%<v%>%<aor%>%<sg%>%<p1%>:дум #  ;
%<v%>%<aor%>%<sg%>%<p2%>:ди #  ;
%<v%>%<aor%>%<sg%>%<p3%>:д #  ;

%<v%>%<aor%>%<pl%>%<p1%>:дим #  ;
%<v%>%<aor%>%<pl%>%<p2%>:дит #  ;
%<v%>%<aor%>%<pl%>%<p3%>:дут #  ;

%<v%>%<aor%>%<sg%>%<p1%>%<neg%>%[+neg%]:дум # ;
%<v%>%<aor%>%<sg%>%<p2%>%<neg%>%[+neg%]:ди # ;
%<v%>%<aor%>%<sg%>%<p3%>%<neg%>%[+neg%]:д # ;

%<v%>%<aor%>%<pl%>%<p1%>%<neg%>%[+neg%]:дим # ;
%<v%>%<aor%>%<pl%>%<p2%>%<neg%>%[+neg%]:дит # ;
%<v%>%<aor%>%<pl%>%<p3%>%<neg%>%[+neg%]:дут # ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
LEXICON RegVerbVow

%<v%>: # ;
%<v%>%<inf%>:ре #  ; 
%<v%>%<past%>%<p1%>:рум #  ;
%<v%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<sg%>: #  ; 
%<v%>%<sg%>%<p1%>: #  ; 
%<v%>%<caus%>%<inf%>:унде #  ; ! caustative

%<v%>%<aor%>%<sg%>%<p1%>:рум #  ;
%<v%>%<aor%>%<sg%>%<p2%>:ри #  ;
%<v%>%<aor%>%<sg%>%<p3%>: #  ;

%<v%>%<aor%>%<pl%>%<p1%>:рим #  ;
%<v%>%<aor%>%<pl%>%<p2%>:рит #  ;
%<v%>%<aor%>%<pl%>%<p3%>:рут #  ;

%<v%>%<aor%>%<sg%>%<p1%>%<neg%>%[+neg%]:рум #  ;
%<v%>%<aor%>%<sg%>%<p2%>%<neg%>%[+neg%]:ри #  ;
%<v%>%<aor%>%<sg%>%<p3%>%<neg%>%[+neg%]: #  ;

%<v%>%<aor%>%<pl%>%<p1%>%<neg%>%[+neg%]:рим #  ;
%<v%>%<aor%>%<pl%>%<p2%>%<neg%>%[+neg%]:рит #  ;
%<v%>%<aor%>%<pl%>%<p3%>%<neg%>%[+neg%]:рут #  ;
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
LEXICON IrreVerb

%<v%>%<past%>%<p1%>:сдорум # ; 
%<v%>%<inf%>:ре #  ; 
%<v%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:сдо #  ; 

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
LEXICON RegPreposition

%<post%>: # ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
LEXICON RegNounInfl


%<n%>%<sg%>: # ;
%<n%>%<prs%>%<p1%>:денуьм # ;

%<n%>%<pl%>:гьо # ;
%<n%>%<neg%>%[+nen%]: # ;
%<n%>%<dat%>:е # ;
%<n%>%<loc%>%[+loc%]: # ;
%<n%>%<loc%>%<ins%>%[+loc%]:евоз # ;
%<n%>%<pl%>%<ez%>:гьой # ;
%<n%>%<adj%>:дуразе # ;
%<n%>%<adj%>:зарзарийе # ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON RegAdverb

%<adv%>: # ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
LEXICON RegAblative

%<abl%>: # ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!                          L E X I C O N                                  !!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
LEXICON AdjectiveRoot

согъ:согъ RegAdjective ; ! adjective
дуне:дуне RegAdjective ; ! adjective
поиз:поиз RegAdjective ; ! adjective
сенгъ:сенгъ RegAdjective ; ! adjective
дуьлшоре:дуьлшоре RegAdjective ; ! adjective
хийегьелуье:хийегьелуье  RegAdjective ; ! adjective
шиновус%<adj%>:шиновус # ;
шиновусдей%<adj%>:шиновусдей # ;
жежурехуно%<adj%>%<dat%>:жежурехуно # ;
тимтиж%<adj%>:тимтиж # ;
хуьшге%<adj%>:хуьшге # ;
тозе%<adj%>:тозе # ;
герек%<adj%>:герек # ; 
рач:рач RegAdjective ;
вемаси:вемаси RegAdjective ;
шуьгъэм:шуьгъэм RegNounInfl ;
озгъун:озгъун RegAdjective ;
келемерди:келемердиv RegAdjective ;
типик:типик RegAdjective ;
жон:жон RegAdjective ;
пертмэхьтел:пертмэхьтел RegAdjective ; 
чуькле:чуькле RegAdjective ; 
мэхьтел:мэхьтел RegAdjective ; 
руьгъэни:руьгъэни RegAdjective ;
пэхьни:пэхьни RegAdjective ;
сохъ:сохъ RegAdjective ;
мэгӀлуьм:мэгӀлуьм RegAdjective ;
пушоте:пушоте RegAdjective ;
тэхьно:тэхьно RegAdjective ;
билесумол:билесумол RegAdjective ;
согъ:согъ RegAdjective ;
гисне:гисне RegAdjective ;
торик:торик RegAdjective ;
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
LEXICON AdverbRoot
гьемише:гьемише RegAdverb ;
имогьо:имогьо RegAdverb ;
хуб:хуб RegAdverb ;
гьеле:гьеле RegAdverb ;
зури-зури:зури-зури RegAdverb ;
йобу:йобу RegAdverb ;
хэйли:хэйли RegAdverb ;
бордор:бордор RegAdverb ; ! an adverb
есир:есир RegAdverb ; ! an adverb
нуькер:нуькер RegAdverb ; ! an adverb
!е% бедире%<art%>%<p1%>%<class%>:е% бедире # ; ! an adverb
!е% одгъу%<art%>%<p1%>%<class%>:е% одгъу # ; ! an adverb
!е% ниме%<art%>%<p1%>%<class%>:е% ниме # ; ! an adverb
!е% жуьфд%<art%>%<class%>:е% жуьфд # ;
темиз:темиз RegAdverb ;


жуьфд%<class%>:жуьфд # ;
доне%<class%>:доне # ; ! an adverb
е%<adv%>:е # ; ! an adverb
гьерчуьтам%<adv%>:гьерчуьтам # ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
LEXICON ArticleRoot

е%<art%>%<p1%>:е # ; ! an article
э:э RegArticle ; ! an article

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
LEXICON AblativeRoot

эз:эз RegAblative ; ! an ablative



!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
LEXICON NumberRoot

дегь:дегь RegNumber ; ! a number
дуь:дуь RegNumber ; ! a number
ек:ек RegNumber ; ! a number
еки:еки RegNumber ; ! a number
нуьгь:нуьгь RegNumber ; ! a number
пенж:пенж RegNumber ; ! a number
сесе:се RegNumber ; ! a number
се:се RegNumber ; ! a number  
хьофд:хьофд RegNumber ; ! a number
хьэшд:хьэшд RegNumber ; ! a number
чор:чор RegNumber ; ! a number
шеш:шеш RegNumber ; ! a number

LEXICON NounRoot
керг:керг RegNounInfl ;
сэгӀэт:сэгӀэт RegNounInfl ;
хэрегуш:хэрегуш RegNounInfl ;
менэхьэфи:менэхьэфи RegNounInfl ;
верф:верф RegNounInfl ;
руш:руш RegNounInfl ;
огъо:огъо RegNounInfl ;
ники:ники RegNounInfl ;
гqэил:гqэил RegNounInfl ;
гушд:гушд RegNounInfl ;
гов:гов RegNounInfl ;
више:више RegNounInfl ;
духдер:духдер RegNounInfl ;
шйьвер:шйьвер RegNounInfl ;
гъэевош:гъэевош RegNounInfl ;
дерму:дерму RegNounInfl ;
пинеши:пинеши RegNounInfl ;
йон:йон RegNounInfl ;
сипре:сипре RegNounInfl ;
гиле:гиле RegNounInfl ;
хун:хун RegNounInfl ;
жоллод:жоллод RegNounInfl ;
гене:гене RegNounInfl ;
бэгъ:бэгъ RegNounInfl ;
мигӀид:мигӀид RegNounInfl ;
музике:музике RegNounInfl ;
куьф:куьф RegNounInfl ;
мейит:мейит RegNounInfl ;
тирйох:тирйох RegNounInfl ;
гӀэребе:гӀэребе RegNounInfl ;
дворник:дворник RegNounInfl ;
партал:партал RegNounInfl ;
кук:кук RegNounInfl ;
шише:шише RegNounInfl ;
тсех:тсех RegNounInfl ;
аслан:аслан RegNounInfl ;
туьлки:туьлки RegNounInfl ;
чай:чай RegNounInfl ;
хьуьзуьм:хьуьзуьм RegNounInfl ;
герми:герми RegNounInfl ;
гӀэдот:гӀэдот RegNounInfl ;
тем:тем RegNounInfl ;
гӀов:гӀов RegNounInfl ;
шохьонгум:шохьонгум RegNounInfl ;
васал:васал RegNounInfl ;
женй:женй RegNounInfl ;
гӀэрмудор:гӀэрмудор RegNounInfl ;
чекмечи:чекмечи RegNounInfl ;
нэхичи:нэхичи RegNounInfl ;
гомиш:гомиш RegNounInfl ;
ошне:ошне RegNounInfl ;
игид:игид RegNounInfl ;
гьэгъ:гьэгъ RegNounInfl ;
суьрх:суьрх RegNounInfl ;
фенд:фенд RegNounInfl ;
жуьргӀэт:жуьргӀэт RegNounInfl ;
руьгъэ:руьгъэ RegNounInfl ;
зэхьмет:зэхьмет RegNounInfl ;
гъимет:гъимет RegNounInfl ;
ведилуь:ведилуь RegNounInfl ;
бала:бала RegNounInfl ;
мужак:мужак RegNounInfl ;
тур:тур RegNounInfl ;
кекуьл:кекуьл RegNounInfl ;
гези:гези RegNounInfl ;
рэхьо:рэхьо RegNounInfl ;
дохьори:дохьори RegNounInfl ;
жэгъэржугъ:жэгъэржугъ RegNounInfl ;
расди:расди RegNounInfl ;
тевер:тевер RegNounInfl ;
сес:сес RegNounInfl ;
мешат:мешат RegNounInfl ;
дивэгӀ:дивэгӀ RegNounInfl ;
сийеь:сийеь RegNounInfl ;
мих:мих RegNounInfl ;
муй:муй RegNounInfl ;
кемер:кемер RegNounInfl ;
гийов:гийов RegNounInfl ;
хуне:хуне RegNounInfl ;
деде:деде RegNounInfl ;
шоь:шоь RegNounInfl ;
институт:институт RegNounInfl ;
керг:керг RegNounInfl ;
деве:деве RegNounInfl ;
жилид:жилид RegNounInfl ;
бала:бала RegNounInfl ;
тожир:тожир RegNounInfl ;
худо:худо RegNounInfl ;
велг:велг RegNounInfl ;
билогъ:билогъ RegNounInfl ; ! A noun
хирс:хирс RegNounInfl ; ! A noun
обур:обур RegNounInfl ; ! A noun
гуж:гуж RegNounInfl ; ! A noun
LEXICON VerbRoot
темиз:темиз RegVerbCon ;
вокурде:вокурде RegVerbVow ;
видовус:видовус RegVerbCon ;
хэрмон:хэрмон RegVerbCon ;
вежеьис:вежеьис RegVerbCon ; 
хэн:хэн RegVerbCon ;
вешсем:вешсем RegVerbCon ;
веровун:веровун RegVerbCon ;
шувун:шувун RegVerbCon ;
огол:огол RegVerbCon ;
симов:симов RegVerbCon ;
батмиш:батмиш RegVerbCon ;
меслэхьэт:меслэхьэт RegVerbCon ; 
шуш:шуш RegVerbCon ;
рэхьбер:рэхьбер RegVerbCon ;
бегьем:бегьем RegVerbCon ;
вохур:вохур RegVerbCon ;
верас:верас RegVerbCon ;
овур:овур RegVerbCon ;
имид:имид RegVerbCon ;
хур:хур RegVerbCon ;
бур:бур RegVerbCon ;
пуч:пуч RegVerbCon ;
хис:хис RegVerbCon ;
варайун:варайун RegVerbCon ;
фурмун:фурмун RegVerbCon ;
зигьис:зигьис RegVerbCon ;
вирих:вирих RegVerbCon ;
вераси:вераси RegVerbVow ;
вози:вози RegVerbVow ;
гирисде:гирисде RegVerbVow ;
пуьрси:пуьрси RegVerbVow ;
офдо:офдо RegVerbVow ;
шогъгъо:шогъгъо RegVerbVow ;
овчийети:овчийети RegVerbVow ;
атланмиш:атланмиш RegVerbCon ;
учмиш:учмиш RegVerbCon ;
дуланмиш:дуланмиш RegVerbCon ;
зе:зе RegVerbVow ;
дур:дур RegVerbCon ;
дуллу:дуллу RegVerbVow ;
вирихд:вирихд RegVerbCon ;
хос:хос RegVerbCon ;
геймиш:геймиш RegVerbCon ;
ватан:ватан RegVerbCon ;
ловтум:ловтум RegVerbCon ;
до:до RegVerbVow ;
гирис:гирис RegVerbCon ; ! a verb
рих:рих RegVerbCon ; ! a verb
сух:сух RegVerbCon ; ! a verb
мугу:мугу RegVerbVow ; ! a verb
би:би IrreVerb ; ! a verb
до:до RegVerbVow ; ! a verb
зе:зе RegVerbVow ; ! a verb
раф:раф RegVerbCon ; ! a verb
сох:сох RegVerbCon ; ! a verb
мун:мун RegVerbCon ;
фyрух:фyрух RegVerbCon ; ! a verb
вебируьт:вебируьт  RegVerbCon ; ! a verb
